src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON мс_что_Nom
+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom:что́ # ;
! LEXICON мс_что_Acc
! +Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc:что́ # ;
! LEXICON мс_что_Gen
! +Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen:чего́ # ;
! LEXICON мс_что_Loc
! +Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc:чём # ;
! LEXICON мс_что_Dat
! +Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat:чему́ # ;
! LEXICON мс_что_Ins
! +Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins:че́м # ;

LEXICON мс_что-либо
+Pron+Indef+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom:что́-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc:что́-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen:чего́-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc:чём-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat:чему́-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins:че́м-либо # ;

LEXICON мс_что-нибудь
+Pron+Indef+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom:что́-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc:что́-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen:чего́-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc:чём-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat:чему́-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins:че́м-нибудь # ;

LEXICON мс_что-то
+Pron+Def+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom:что́-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc:что́-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen:чего́-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc:чём-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat:чему́-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins:че́м-то # ;

LEXICON мс_нечто
+Pron+Def+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +Pron+Def+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;

LEXICON мс_нечего ! TODO FIX tag order (especially Pred)
+Pron+Pred+Neu+Inan+Sg: мс_нечего_Gen ;
+Pron+Pred+Neu+Inan+Sg: мс_нечего_Loc ;
+Pron+Pred+Neu+Inan+Sg: мс_нечего_Dat ;
+Pron+Pred+Neu+Inan+Sg: мс_нечего_Ins ;

! LEXICON мс_нечего_Acc
! +Acc:что # ;
! LEXICON мс_нечего_Gen
! +Gen:чего # ;
! LEXICON мс_нечего_Loc
! +Loc:чем # ;
! LEXICON мс_нечего_Dat
! +Dat:чему # ;
! LEXICON мс_нечего_Ins
! +Ins:чем # ;

LEXICON мс_другдруга
+Pron: мс_другдруга_Acc ;
+Pron: мс_другдруга_Gen ;
+Pron: мс_другдруга_Loc ;
+Pron: мс_другдруга_Dat ;
+Pron: мс_другдруга_Ins ;

! LEXICON мс_другдруга_Acc
! +Acc:дру́га # ;
! LEXICON мс_другдруга_Gen
! +Gen:дру́га # ;
! LEXICON мс_другдруга_Loc
! +Loc:дру́ге # ;
! LEXICON мс_другдруга_Dat
! +Dat:дру́гу # ;
! LEXICON мс_другдруга_Ins
! +Ins:дру́гом # ;

LEXICON мс_я ! TODO add multiple gender readings Msc/Fem? What about animacy?
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom:я́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg1+Acc:меня́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg1+Gen:меня́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg1+Loc:мне́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg1+Dat:мне́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ins:мно́й # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ins+Use/NG:мно́ю # ;

LEXICON мс_ты ! TODO add multiple gender readings Msc/Fem? What about animacy?
+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom:ты́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Acc:тебя́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Gen:тебя́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Loc:тебе́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Dat:тебе́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ins:тобо́й # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ins+Use/NG:тобо́ю # ;

LEXICON мс_он ! TODO tags?
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc+Nom:о́н # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc+Acc:его́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc+Gen:его́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc+Loc:нём # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc+Dat:ему́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc+Ins:и́м # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc+Acc+PObj:него́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc+Gen+PObj:него́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc+Dat+PObj:нему́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc+Ins+PObj:ни́м # ;

LEXICON мс_оно ! TODO tags?
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Neu+Nom:оно́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Neu+Acc:его́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Neu+Gen:его́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Neu+Loc:нём # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Neu+Dat:ему́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Neu+Ins:и́м # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Neu+Acc+PObj:него́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Neu+Gen+PObj:него́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Neu+Dat+PObj:нему́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Neu+Ins+PObj:ни́м # ;

LEXICON мс_она ! TODO tags?
+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Nom:она́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Acc:её # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Gen:её # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Loc:не́й # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Dat:е́й # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Ins:е́й # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Ins+Use/NG:е́ю # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Acc+PObj:неё # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Gen+PObj:неё # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Dat+PObj:не́й # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Ins+PObj:не́й # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem+Ins+PObj+Use/NG:не́ю # ;

! LEXICON мс_мы ! TODO tags?
! +Pron+Pers+Pl1+Nom:мы́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Pl1+Acc:на́с # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Pl1+Gen:на́с # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Pl1+Loc:на́с # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Pl1+Dat:на́м # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ins:на́ми # ;

! LEXICON мс_вы ! TODO tags?
! +Pron+Pers+Pl2+Nom:вы́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Pl2+Acc:ва́с # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Pl2+Gen:ва́с # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Pl2+Loc:ва́с # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Pl2+Dat:ва́м # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Pl2+Ins:ва́ми # ;

! LEXICON мс_они ! TODO tags?
! +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Nom:они́ # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc:и́х # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Gen:и́х # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Loc:ни́х # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Dat:и́м # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ins:и́ми # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc+PObj:ни́х # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Gen+PObj:ни́х # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Dat+PObj:ни́м # ;
! +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ins+PObj:ни́ми # ;

LEXICON мс_себя ! TODO tags?
+Pron+Refl+Nom:себя́ # ;
! +Pron+Refl+Acc:себя́ # ;
! +Pron+Refl+Gen:себя́ # ;
! +Pron+Refl+Loc:себе́ # ;
! +Pron+Refl+Dat:себе́ # ;
! +Pron+Refl+Ins:собо́й # ;
! +Pron+Refl+Ins+Use/NG:собо́ю # ;

LEXICON мс_столько
+Pron+Nom:о # ;
! +Pron+Acc:о # ;
! +Pron+Gen:ого # ;
! +Pron+Loc:ом # ;
! +Pron+Dat:ому # ;
! +Pron+Ins:им # ;

LEXICON мс_мо_[п_a]_SgOnly
+Pron+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom:%>ый # ;
! +Pron+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого # ;
! +Pron+Msc+Anim+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
! +Pron+Msc+Anim+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
! +Pron+Msc+Anim+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
! +Pron+Msc+Anim+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;

LEXICON мс_с_[п_a]_SgOnly
+Pron+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom:%>ое # ;
! +Pron+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc:%>ое # ;
! +Pron+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
! +Pron+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
! +Pron+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
! +Pron+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;

LEXICON мс_жо_[п_a]_SgOnly
+Pron+Fem+Anim+Sg+Nom:%>ая # ;
! +Pron+Fem+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ую # ;
! +Pron+Fem+Anim+Sg+Gen:%>ой # ;
! +Pron+Fem+Anim+Sg+Loc:%>ой # ;
! +Pron+Fem+Anim+Sg+Dat:%>ой # ;
! +Pron+Fem+Anim+Sg+Ins:%>ой # ;
! +Pron+Fem+Anim+Sg+Ins+Use/NG:%>ою # ;

! LEXICON мс_мн._одуш._[п_a]
! +Pron+MFN+Anim+Pl+Nom:%>ые # ;
! +Pron+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ых # ;
! +Pron+MFN+Anim+Pl+Gen:%>ых # ;
! +Pron+MFN+Anim+Pl+Loc:%>ых # ;
! +Pron+MFN+Anim+Pl+Dat:%>ым # ;
! +Pron+MFN+Anim+Pl+Ins:%>ыми # ;

LEXICON мс_мо_[п_b]_SgOnly
+Pron+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom:%>о́й # ;
! +Pron+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>о́го # ;
! +Pron+Msc+Anim+Sg+Gen:%>о́го # ;
! +Pron+Msc+Anim+Sg+Loc:%>о́м # ;
! +Pron+Msc+Anim+Sg+Dat:%>о́му # ;
! +Pron+Msc+Anim+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м # ;

LEXICON мс_с_[п_b]_SgOnly
+Pron+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom:%>о́е # ;
! +Pron+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc:%>о́е # ;
! +Pron+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen:%>о́го # ;
! +Pron+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc:%>о́м # ;
! +Pron+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat:%>о́му # ;
! +Pron+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м # ;

LEXICON мс_жо_[п_b]_SgOnly
+Pron+Fem+Anim+Sg+Nom:%>а́я # ;
! +Pron+Fem+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>у́ю # ;
! +Pron+Fem+Anim+Sg+Gen:%>о́й # ;
! +Pron+Fem+Anim+Sg+Loc:%>о́й # ;
! +Pron+Fem+Anim+Sg+Dat:%>о́й # ;
! +Pron+Fem+Anim+Sg+Ins:%>о́й # ;
! +Pron+Fem+Anim+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>о́ю # ;
